Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
PRIORITY GUIDELINES

Note

Part heading amended
by L 1986, c 276, §28.

§226-101 Purpose. The purpose of this
part is to establish overall priority guidelines to address areas of statewide
concern. [L 1978, c 100, pt of §2; am L 1984, c 236, §14]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next